ukrainian/test.aff
SFX Z Y 213
SFX Z ому ий .
SFX Z и ам .
SFX Z те мося .
SFX Z ові ах .
SFX Z ла ть .
SFX Z м шся .
SFX Z ю ь .
SFX Z о им .
SFX Z ся ть .
SFX Z ій о .
SFX Z ось ася .
SFX Z ись ься .
SFX Z в тимеш .
SFX Z ий ости .
SFX Z ють й .
SFX Z ці ко .
SFX Z ості ими .
SFX Z сть й .
SFX Z єш вать .
SFX Z тимуть ла .
SFX Z ась о .
SFX Z име ь .
SFX Z всь ти .
SFX Z йтесь ємось .
SFX Z єтесь ймося .
SFX Z етесь уся .
SFX Z тиму в .
SFX Z ї єю .
SFX Z их 0 .
SFX Z еш усь .
SFX Z є ймося .
SFX Z нні тимеш .
SFX Z юсь йся .
SFX Z усь еш .
SFX Z вать є .
SFX Z йсь ють .
SFX Z ння тимешся .
SFX Z ка 0 .
SFX Z не ти .
SFX Z на ти .
SFX Z ну ться .
SFX Z ах овими .
SFX Z еві ями .
SFX Z ова ами .
SFX Z ку ах .
SFX Z ове ів .
SFX Z ннях вши .
SFX Z вані ємо .
SFX Z уй овані .
SFX Z нь тимешся .
SFX Z ять ило .
SFX Z ок е .
SFX Z ову 0 .
SFX Z іть емо .
SFX Z цях ка .
SFX Z льні тимемся .
SFX Z ча 0 .
SFX Z іше ості .
SFX Z іша ости .
SFX Z іші ости .
SFX Z ючі єте .
SFX Z шу й .
SFX Z че 0 .
SFX Z ючу єш .
SFX Z ські ами .
SFX Z ське ку .
SFX Z остях ими .
SFX Z ить у .
SFX Z це ків .
SFX Z иш еним .
SFX Z остей ім .
SFX Z ць ки .
SFX Z ені ило .
SFX Z іш ої .
SFX Z итесь імось .
SFX Z иця ою .
SFX Z тва ького .
SFX Z тві ькій .
SFX Z тву ьких .
SFX Z йні є .
SFX Z ай уймо .
SFX Z ація ованою .
SFX Z чні я .
SFX Z ині а .
SFX Z юй яться .
SFX Z ч тимеш .
SFX Z єві я .
SFX Z та ла .
SFX Z ту вшись .
SFX Z ник і .
SFX Z нуть атимуть .
SFX Z торі ція .
SFX Z змі стах .
SFX Z зму стом .
SFX Z тора ції .
SFX Z зме стах .
SFX Z вачі йтеся .
SFX Z вачу ються .
SFX Z аціях уватиму .
SFX Z ичі у .
SFX Z цькі ках .
SFX Z торе ційними .
SFX Z яй юватиме .
SFX Z лі в .
SFX Z цьке ків .
SFX Z тору ційній .
SFX Z жу или .
SFX Z зі гами .
SFX Z лу ймо .
SFX Z ичу ого .
SFX Z ева і .
SFX Z ле йте .
SFX Z тор ційну .
SFX Z ьтесь яться .
SFX Z ин о .
SFX Z сі 0 .
SFX Z івні овича .
SFX Z уваті ах .
SFX Z инях ах .
SFX Z исті ами .
SFX Z ливі ному .
SFX Z лива ними .
SFX Z подібні вим .
SFX Z иня ічної .
SFX Z ливе не .
SFX Z уті емося .
SFX Z ливу них .
SFX Z еве ям .
SFX Z чик у .
SFX Z тивні цію .
SFX Z чуть тали .
SFX Z ера і .
SFX Z ері ом .
SFX Z тать чем .
SFX Z еньке ім .
SFX Z енькі ій .
SFX Z єва ї .
SFX Z ере 0 .
SFX Z т ціє .
SFX Z істі у .
SFX Z ая ість .
SFX Z овні ування .
SFX Z еру и .
SFX Z єве їв .
SFX Z еву у .
SFX Z щу стила .
SFX Z ді не .
SFX Z шать ть .
SFX Z яні ювати .
SFX Z ща 0 .
SFX Z зу тичної .
SFX Z торні ційному .
SFX Z ер увало .
SFX Z ївні йовичу .
SFX Z зе тичний .
SFX Z єву ям .
SFX Z ищі ами .
SFX Z іні ою .
SFX Z ище е .
SFX Z очу айте .
SFX Z юк овими .
SFX Z га жному .
SFX Z тні ціє .
SFX Z тя их .
SFX Z дуть ли .
SFX Z тті вшися .
SFX Z арі овому .
SFX Z чук івка .
SFX Z оду ідному .
SFX Z гу жною .
SFX Z їть єній .
SFX Z їш єним .
SFX Z івця ами .
SFX Z ха ні .
SFX Z оні ами .
SFX Z єні ювала .
SFX Z де в .
SFX Z арях и .
SFX Z ху шки .
SFX Z кать ну .
SFX Z ологія ів .
SFX Z їтесь юся .
SFX Z ар ом .
SFX Z же зали .
SFX Z жуть зали .
SFX Z оті ім .
SFX Z чать к .
SFX Z арні и .
SFX Z овик у .
SFX Z аря ове .
SFX Z часті ках .
SFX Z як их .
SFX Z иті е .
SFX Z ін ове .
SFX Z г жку .
SFX Z жні гам .
SFX Z іва ові .
SFX Z сні м .
SFX Z су ту .
SFX Z іві ова .
SFX Z іве ову .
SFX Z да не .
SFX Z уні ом .
SFX Z дні й .
SFX Z їні й .
SFX Z д ти .
SFX Z са у .
SFX Z урі 0 .
SFX Z ищ ка .
SFX Z еняті у .
SFX Z с ку .
SFX Z се м .
SFX Z еті 0 .

SFX a Y 159
SFX a у ий .
SFX a и е .
SFX a е ові .
SFX a ові ам .
SFX a а ів .
SFX a о ім .
SFX a ю ях .
SFX a ться ш .
SFX a ім о .
SFX a й єм .
SFX a ося ась .
SFX a ь имуть .
SFX a ися ься .
SFX a им ости .
SFX a в тиме .
SFX a ці ками .
SFX a сті ю .
SFX a ася о .
SFX a вся ти .
SFX a єм вав .
SFX a єш вав .
SFX a йтеся ємось .
SFX a єтеся ймося .
SFX a етеся уся .
SFX a ешся уся .
SFX a єшся ймося .
SFX a ої 0 .
SFX a ем уся .
SFX a еш уся .
SFX a кам ок .
SFX a є ватиме .
SFX a нні вши .
SFX a тимемся вшися .
SFX a ємся юсь .
SFX a юся йся .
SFX a уся еш .
SFX a нням ла .
SFX a йся ють .
SFX a ння ться .
SFX a них 0 .
SFX a ах ового .
SFX a ом ному .
SFX a вих м .
SFX a еві я .
SFX a ннях тимем .
SFX a вані єте .
SFX a к ми .
SFX a ських 0 .
SFX a цях ки .
SFX a льні тимешся .
SFX a чих ть .
SFX a ших сть .
SFX a іші ими .
SFX a ючі йте .
SFX a ські кою .
SFX a цям ків .
SFX a иш енім .
SFX a остях ій .
SFX a остям ий .
SFX a ені ите .
SFX a итеся імось .
SFX a імся имось .
SFX a ишся імось .
SFX a ця м .
SFX a ії ої .
SFX a іш е .
SFX a имся імся .
SFX a тві ькім .
SFX a ація увавши .
SFX a йні ями .
SFX a ині 0 .
SFX a чні 0 .
SFX a чам льними .
SFX a ч тимусь .
SFX a єві ями .
SFX a тих вши .
SFX a торам ціє .
SFX a змі стом .
SFX a стам змом .
SFX a цьких кові .
SFX a вачі ймось .
SFX a аціях увавши .
SFX a аціям ованим .
SFX a лих ти .
SFX a рі 0 .
SFX a ичі а .
SFX a зм ст .
SFX a цькі ків .
SFX a лі ють .
SFX a зі го .
SFX a тор ціям .
SFX a ьтеся яться .
SFX a ин ок .
SFX a івні овичу .
SFX a сі хо .
SFX a инях ів .
SFX a уваті и .
SFX a нам м .
SFX a иням ічного .
SFX a подібні вих .
SFX a иня ічною .
SFX a ливі не .
SFX a уті етесь .
SFX a тивні ція .
SFX a еньких ими .
SFX a ерам у .
SFX a немся авшися .
SFX a енькі ім .
SFX a ая істю .
SFX a іст у .
SFX a овні увавши .
SFX a твам ького .
SFX a яні ювала .
SFX a торні цією .
SFX a ист у .
SFX a ер увати .
SFX a ищам у .
SFX a ївні йович .
SFX a ищі е .
SFX a змам стові .
SFX a тя ий .
SFX a ді на .
SFX a атам уватиму .
SFX a тті вши .
SFX a ттям ватиму .
SFX a їм єним .
SFX a дам 0 .
SFX a їш єних .
SFX a хам 0 .
SFX a єні ювали .
SFX a іні ами .
SFX a 'ям ною .
SFX a оні и .
SFX a тні чу .
SFX a ат уємо .
SFX a лам ти .
SFX a арях ові .
SFX a 'ї ну .
SFX a арям овими .
SFX a їтеся юся .
SFX a їшся юся .
SFX a ар ів .
SFX a гам жній .
SFX a оті і .
SFX a ологія е .
SFX a аря ова .
SFX a жні гах .
SFX a арні ові .
SFX a іві ову .
SFX a г жки .
SFX a иті а .
SFX a ін ина .
SFX a уні ів .
SFX a енятам а .
SFX a зам 0 .
SFX a с ка .
SFX a ищ 0 .
SFX a дні в .
SFX a іт е .

SFX b Y 129
SFX b ому е .
SFX b и ові .
SFX b ові ів .
SFX b е ом .
SFX b ла в .
SFX b о ій .
SFX b ю й .
SFX b ся шись .
SFX b й єш .
SFX b ь имемо .
SFX b м сть .
SFX b в тиму .
SFX b сті ї .
SFX b ці кам .
SFX b єш ючи .
SFX b є ватиму .
SFX b ї є .
SFX b ні у .
SFX b тимеш нням .
SFX b тиму нням .
SFX b ння лось .
SFX b их ням .
SFX b на ла .
SFX b ну вшись .
SFX b ах овому .
SFX b ка ами .
SFX b еві у .
SFX b ова ах .
SFX b ку и .
SFX b ннях тимеш .
SFX b ок кові .
SFX b ову і .
SFX b іша ості .
SFX b іші ого .
SFX b юча ємо .
SFX b ючі ймо .
SFX b цях ець .
SFX b шу м .
SFX b ючу ватимем .
SFX b ські у .
SFX b иш еною .
SFX b остях ім .
SFX b иця ім .
SFX b тва ькому .
SFX b іш а .
SFX b тві ький .
SFX b тву ької .
SFX b ія 0 .
SFX b ч тимуся .
SFX b єві їв .
SFX b та ло .
SFX b ту вшися .
SFX b тора цію .
SFX b ник ками .
SFX b неш айте .
SFX b змі сті .
SFX b зму сті .
SFX b вачі ймося .
SFX b вача йтесь .
SFX b вачу ємось .
SFX b аціях ованій .
SFX b ича і .
SFX b ичі ою .
SFX b торі ційними .
SFX b цькі ку .
SFX b тору ційнім .
SFX b лі єте .
SFX b жу ило .
SFX b ичу ій .
SFX b тор ціях .
SFX b лу єм .
SFX b зі гам .
SFX b ин ові .
SFX b инях ом .
SFX b уваті ові .
SFX b сі хами .
SFX b лива ного .
SFX b ева ями .
SFX b иня ією .
SFX b ливі ним .
SFX b уті етеся .
SFX b ливу ної .
SFX b чик ом .
SFX b ера ами .
SFX b ері 0 .
SFX b енькі ою .
SFX b єва й .
SFX b ая ості .
SFX b іст ах .
SFX b еру ів .
SFX b щу стили .
SFX b зу тичною .
SFX b чеш тівши .
SFX b еву а .
SFX b ища а .
SFX b ер увать .
SFX b ист ам .
SFX b єву ях .
SFX b юк ова .
SFX b ищі ам .
SFX b тя ої .
SFX b очу ала .
SFX b га жними .
SFX b тті вавшись .
SFX b ді нім .
SFX b чук івки .
SFX b арі овими .
SFX b оду ідними .
SFX b гу жний .
SFX b їш єної .
SFX b ха ну .
SFX b івця у .
SFX b ат уєте .
SFX b ху шку .
SFX b рях 0 .
SFX b ар о .
SFX b оті и .
SFX b як ої .
SFX b аря ову .
SFX b іва ове .
SFX b су ом .
SFX b ін 0 .
SFX b иті ій .
SFX b вик м .
SFX b да ні .
SFX b са ом .
SFX b яча і .
SFX b олог 0 .
SFX b с н .

SFX c Y 85
SFX c ому і .
SFX c и ів .
SFX c і ям .
SFX c е ься .
SFX c о их .
SFX c ю єте .
SFX c ся шися .
SFX c а ись .
SFX c ь имете .
SFX c й сть .
SFX c м стю .
SFX c в ться .
SFX c єш ватимем .
SFX c є ї .
SFX c тиму вшись .
SFX c тимеш вшись .
SFX c ння лося .
SFX c ї й .
SFX c них вши .
SFX c ну вшися .
SFX c ах ній .
SFX c ових у .
SFX c ку е .
SFX c ннях тиме .
SFX c к ці .
SFX c ських ці .
SFX c ших стю .
SFX c ючих ємо .
SFX c ову е .
SFX c цях кові .
SFX c шу 0 .
SFX c ючу ватимеш .
SFX c иш ений .
SFX c стях ю .
SFX c иця і .
SFX c іш у .
SFX c тву ькою .
SFX c ація уватиме .
SFX c ч льні .
SFX c тих ла .
SFX c ту лось .
SFX c неш аємо .
SFX c зму сте .
SFX c цьких ками .
SFX c вачу ємося .
SFX c аціях ованім .
SFX c лих вши .
SFX c тору ційний .
SFX c жу ити .
SFX c ичу е .
SFX c лу єш .
SFX c евих і .
SFX c тор цій .
SFX c инях у .
SFX c ин ів .
SFX c ливих нім .
SFX c ливу ною .
SFX c иня ії .
SFX c євих ю .
SFX c еньких ого .
SFX c ая осте .
SFX c іст ам .
SFX c еру уванням .
SFX c щу стило .
SFX c чеш тіть .
SFX c еву ь .
SFX c зу тичні .
SFX c ер а .
SFX c ист ах .
SFX c єву йовичі .
SFX c тя а .
SFX c очу ати .
SFX c гу жних .
SFX c ду не .
SFX c їш єною .
SFX c ат уймо .
SFX c івця ах .
SFX c ху шка .
SFX c арях ового .
SFX c аря ою .
SFX c су ну .
SFX c ологія а .
SFX c ар е .
SFX c ячих і .
SFX c ін ин .
